Utah statutes.
48-2a-501.   Form of contribution.

The contribution of a partner may be in cash, property, or services rendered, or a promissory note or other obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services.



Enacted by Chapter 233, 1990 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

